California, session 20252026, AB1912.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 4370 of the Fish and Game Code is amended to read:4370. (a)In every area in which deer may lawfully be taken during the general open season there is an archery season for the taking of deer with bow and arrow. The season for each area shall be as the commission may prescribe, with a minimum interposing interval of three days immediately preceding the regular open season on deer in that area.(b)A person may carry a firearm capable of being concealed on their person while engaged in the taking of deer with bow and arrow in accordance with subdivision (a), but shall not take or attempt to take deer with the firearm.